Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 35. Virginia Disability Commission.

(Contingent expiration)

§ 30-232.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Virginia Disability Commission; purpose.

The Virginia Disability Commission (the Commission) is established in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission is to identify and recommend legislative priorities and policies for adoption or examination by the General Assembly in order to provide ongoing support in developing and reviewing services and funding related to Virginians with physical and sensory disabilities. The Commission shall submit its recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor by October 1 of each year.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015; 2011, c. 686.

The numbers of §§ 30-232 through 30-239

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2004 act having been 30-226 to 30-233.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, as amended by Acts 2019, c. 854, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 686 added the last sentence.

§ 30-233.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Membership; terms; vacancies; chairman and vice-chairman.

The Commission shall consist of 11 members that includes six legislative members and five nonlegislative citizen members. Members shall be appointed as follows: two members of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; four members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; two nonlegislative citizen members, one of whom shall be a consumer with a disability and one shall be a member of the medical, insurance, or rehabilitation professions, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules upon consideration of the recommendation of the Governor, if any; and three nonlegislative citizen members, one of whom shall be a consumer with a disability, one shall be a member of the medical, insurance, or rehabilitation professions, and one shall be a citizen at large, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates upon consideration of the recommendations of the Governor, if any. Nonlegislative citizen members of the Commission shall be citizens of the Commonwealth of Virginia. Unless otherwise approved in writing by the chairman of the Commission and the respective Clerk, nonlegislative citizen members shall only be reimbursed for travel originating and ending within the Commonwealth of Virginia for the purpose of attending meetings.

Legislative members of the Commission shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for terms of two years. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Legislative and nonlegislative citizen members may be reappointed. However, no nonlegislative citizen member shall serve more than four consecutive two-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its legislative membership.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015; 2010, c. 101.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of the first enactment of this act, the Lieutenant Governor shall serve as chairman of the Commission, the Commission shall elect a vice-chairman from among its legislative membership, and the Office of the Clerk of the Senate shall provide administrative staff support until January 14, 2006. Thereafter, the election of the chairman and vice-chairman and the determination of the administrative staff support shall be in accordance with the provisions of the first enactment.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 10, in the first paragraph, substituted “11 members” for “12 members” and deleted “and the Lieutenant Governor” following “citizen members” in the first sentence, and deleted “Lieutenant Governor” at the end of the second sentence; deleted “Lieutenant Governor” following “the Commission” near the beginning of the second paragraph; and made related changes.

§ 30-234.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Quorum; meetings; voting on recommendations.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

§ 30-235.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Compensation and expenses.

Legislative members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation as provided in §

2.2-2813

for the performance of their duties. All members shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. However, all such compensation and expenses shall be paid from existing appropriations to the Commission.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

§ 30-236.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Serve as the primary forum in the Commonwealth where the needs of and issues affecting people with physical and sensory disabilities are identified and addressed through the collaboration of members of the legislative and executive branches of state government, including the staff of legislative and executive branch agencies, and citizens of the Commonwealth;

Develop, evaluate, and advance budget proposals and legislative and policy recommendations to support a service system that maximizes the self-sufficiency of Virginians with disabilities;

Develop and evaluate recommendations for service program changes and funding related to services for persons with physical and sensory disabilities;

Advise on local, state and federal policies and programs relevant to citizens with disabilities;

Serve as the primary body for coordinating proposals and recommendations of all commissions and agencies for legislation or budget actions affecting persons with physical and sensory disabilities, including receiving, reviewing, and responding to proposals and recommendations; and

Convene work groups composed of persons with expertise in the matters under consideration by the Commission to assist the Commission on issues related to (i) housing and transportation, (ii) education and employment, (iii) publicly funded services, and (iv) such other issues as the Commission may deem necessary. Persons serving on the work groups shall serve without compensation.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015; 2011, c. 686; 2012, c. 741.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

Acts 2012, c. 741, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall convene a work group that includes representatives of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, the Virginia Disability Commission, the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy, the Departments of Rehabilitative Services and Housing and Community Development, the Virginia Housing Development Authority, and other stakeholders to develop a plan to improve access to housing and transportation for Virginians with disabilities, including options for encouraging the development of new accessible housing that is located in a manner to ensure access to public transportation and other transportation services for individuals with disabilities.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 686, in subdivision 1, substituted “where the needs of and issues affecting people with physical and sensory disabilities are identified and addressed” for “where the needs and issues of people with disabilities are addressed”; in subdivision 2, substituted “Develop, evaluate, and advance budget proposals and legislative and policy recommendations to support a service system” for “Evaluate budget proposals and policy issues oriented towards a service system”; in subdivision 3, substituted “evaluate” for “review”; added subdivision 5 and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 741 added the subsection A designator and subdivision A 6, and made a related change.

§ 30-237.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Staffing.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the Senate or the Office of the Clerk of the House of Delegates as may be appropriate for the house in which the chairman of the Commission serves. The Division of Legislative Services shall provide legal, research, policy analysis and other services as requested by the Commission.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission, upon request.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

§ 30-238.
(Contingent expiration date — see notes) Chairman’s executive summary of activity and work of the Commission.

The chairman shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2004, cc. 992, 1015.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 992 and 1015, cl. 2 provides: “That for its first year of existence, if the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act, the Commission may be funded from the operating budgets of the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates upon the approval of the Joint Rules Committee. If the Commission is not funded by a separate appropriation in the appropriation act for any year thereafter, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was provided by Item 8 of Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020.

§ 30-239.
Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 741, cl. 3.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-239, which provided the July 1, 2012, sunset clause for this chapter, derived from 2004, cc. 992, 1015; 2007, c. 459.